sv: Storlekssystem för tävlingsdräkter: 48; 50; 52); Bokstav (XS–XXXL); Specialanpassad/skräddarsydd; Barn; Numerisk (t.ex.; Ungdom; Övrigt
fr: Système de tailles des combinaisons de course: 48; 50; 52); Alpha (XS-XXXL); Personnalisé / sur mesure; Enfant; Numérique (par ex.; Adolescent; Autre
sk-SK: Tabuľka veľkostí pre pretekárske kombinézy: 48; 50; 52); Abecedné (XS – XXXL); Na mieru; Detské; Číselné (napr.; Mládežnícke; Iné
hr-HR: Sustav veličina trkaćeg odijela: 48; 50; 52); Slovne oznake (XS – XXXL); Prilagođeno / šivano po mjeri; Dječje; Brojčano (npr.; Za mlade; Ostalo
fi: Kilpapuvun kokojärjestelmä: 48; 50; 52); Kirjainkoko (XS–XXXL); Mukautettu / mittatilaus; Lasten; Numerokoko (esim.; Nuorten; Muu
es: Sistema de tallas de trajes de carreras: 48; 50; 52); Alfanumérico (XS-XXXL); Personalizado/A medida; Niños; Numérico (por ejemplo,; Jóvenes; Otro
ja: レーススーツサイズシステム: 48; 50; 52); アルファ (XS-XXXL); カスタム / オーダーメイド; キッズ; 数値 (例:; ユース; その他
nl: Maatsysteem racepakken: 48; 50; 52); Alpha (XS-XXXL); Maatwerk / op maat gemaakt; Kinderen; Numeriek (bijv.; Jeugd; Overig
pt-BR: Macacão de competição, sistema de tamanhos: 48; 50; 52); Alfa (PP-XGG); Personalizado/sob medida; Infantil; Numérico (ex.; Juvenil; Outros
vi: Hệ thống kích cỡ bộ đồ đua: 48; 50; 52); Chữ cái (XS-XXXL); Tùy chỉnh / May đo; Trẻ em; Số (VD:; Thanh thiếu niên; Khác
en: Racing suit size system: 48; 50; 52); Alpha (XS-XXXL); Custom / made-to-measure; Kids; Numeric (e.g.; Youth; Other
pl: System rozmiarów kombinezonu wyścigowego: 48; 50; 52); Literowa (XS–XXXL); Niestandardowa / na wymiar; Dziecięca; Numeryczna (np.; Młodzieżowa; Inne
ro-RO: Sistem de mărimi pentru combinezoane de curse: 48; 50; 52); Alfabetic (XS-XXXL); Personalizat / făcut la comandă; Copii; Numeric (ex.; Tineret; Altele
ru: Система размеров гоночного костюма: 48; 50; 52); Буквенная (XS-XXXL); Индивидуальный пошив / по меркам; Детская; Цифровая (например,; Подростковая; Другое
hu: Versenyruha méretezési rendszere: 48; 50; 52); Betűméretezés (XS–XXXL); Egyedi / méretre készült; Gyerek; Számozott (pl.; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
bg-BG: Система за размери на състезателен костюм: 48; 50; 52); Буквена (XS – XXXL); По поръчка / по мярка; Детска; Цифрова (напр.; За младежи; Друго
el: Σύστημα μεγέθους αγωνιστικής στολής: 48; 50; 52); Αλφαβητικό (XS-XXXL); Ειδική παραγγελία / στα μέτρα σας; Παιδικό; Αριθμητικό (π.χ.; Εφηβικό; Άλλο
zh-CN: 赛车服尺码体系: 48; 50; 52); 字母（XS-XXXL）; 定制/量身定制; 儿童; 数字（例如; 青少年; 其他
zh-TW: 賽車服尺寸系統: 48; 50; 52); 字母 (XS-XXXL); 訂製 / 量身定做; 兒童; 數字 (例如; 青少年; 其他
pt-PT: Sistema de tamanhos dos fatos de corrida: 48; 50; 52); Alfanumérico (XS-XXXL); Personalizado / feito à medida; Crianças; Numérico (ex.; Jovens; Outro
it: Sistema di taglia della tuta da corsa: 48; 50; 52); Alfanumerico (XS-XXXL); Personalizzato/su misura; Bambini; Numerico (es.; Ragazzi; Altro
da: Størrelsessystem for racerdragt: 48; 50; 52); Alfabetisk (XS-XXXL); Specialtilpasset/skræddersyet; Børn; Numerisk (f.eks.; Unge; Andet
th: ระบบการกำหนดขนาดชุดแข่งรถ: 48; 50; 52); ตัวอักษร (XS-XXXL); ปรับแต่ง / สั่งตัดตามขนาด; เด็ก; ตัวเลข (เช่น; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
ko: 레이싱 슈트 사이즈 시스템: 48; 50; 52); 알파(XS~XXXL); 맞춤/주문 제작; 아동용; 숫자(예:; 청소년용; 기타
de: Zertifizierungsstandard des Rennanzugs: 48; 50; 52); Alpha (XS-XXXL); Benutzerdefiniert / Maßanfertigung; Kinder; Numerisch (z. B.; Jugendliche; Sonstige
tr: Yarış tulumu beden sistemi: 48; 50; 52); Harf (XS-XXXL); Özel / kişiye özel üretim; Çocuk; Sayısal (ör.; Genç; Diğer
lt-LT: Lenktynių kostiumų dydžių sistema: 48; 50; 52); Raidinė (XS–XXXL); Pritaikyta / pasiūta pagal išmatavimus; Vaikų; Skaitinė (pvz.,; Jaunimo; Kita
cs: Velikostní systém závodního obleku: 48; 50; 52); Značení písmeny (XS–XXXL); Na míru; Dětské; Číselné (např.; Mládežnické; Ostatní
nb: Størrelsessystem for racingdrakt: 48; 50; 52); Bokstav (XS–XXXL); Spesialtilpasset / etter mål; Barn; Numerisk (f.eks.; Ungdom; Annet
sl-SI: Sistem velikosti dirkaškega kombinezona: 48; 50; 52); Črkovno (XS–XXXL); Po meri; Otroško; Številčno (npr.; Mladinsko; Drugo